Nebraska, session 109, LB626.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 18-2101.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
18-2101.02 (1) For any city that (a) intends to carry out a
redevelopment project which will involve the construction of workforce
housing in an extremely blighted area as authorized under subdivision
(28)(g) of section 18-2103, (b) intends to prepare a redevelopment plan
that will divide ad valorem taxes for a period of more than fifteen years
but not more than twenty years as provided in subdivision (4)(a) of
section 18-2147, (b) (c) intends to declare an area as an extremely
blighted area for purposes of funding decisions under subdivision (1)(b)
of section 58-708, or (c) (d) intends to declare an area as an extremely
blighted area in order for individuals purchasing residences in such area
to qualify for the income tax credit authorized in subsection (7) of
section 77-2715.07, the governing body of such city shall first declare,
by resolution adopted after the public hearings required under this
section, such area to be an extremely blighted area.
(2) Prior to making such declaration, the governing body of the city
shall conduct or cause to be conducted a study or an analysis on whether
the area is extremely blighted and shall submit the question of whether
such area is extremely blighted to the planning commission or board of
the city for its review and recommendation. The planning commission or
board shall hold a public hearing on the question after giving notice of
the hearing as provided in section 18-2115.01. The planning commission or
board shall submit its written recommendations to the governing body of
the city within thirty days after the public hearing.
(3) Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission
or board, or if no recommendations are received within thirty days after
the public hearing required under subsection (2) of this section, the
governing body shall hold a public hearing on the question of whether the
area is extremely blighted after giving notice of the hearing as provided
in section 18-2115.01. At the public hearing, all interested parties
-2-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to express their views
respecting the proposed declaration. After such hearing, the governing
body of the city may make its declaration.
(4) Copies of each study or analysis conducted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section shall be posted on the city's public
website or made available for public inspection at a location designated
by the city.
(5) The study or analysis required under subsection (2) of this
section may be conducted in conjunction with the study or analysis
required under section 18-2109. The hearings required under this section
may be held in conjunction with the hearings required under section
18-2109.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Community
Development Law, the designation of an area as an extremely blighted area
pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of no less than
twenty-five years from the effective date of the resolution declaring
such area to be an extremely blighted area, except that such designation
may be removed prior to the end of such period pursuant to section
18-2156.
Sec. 2. Section 18-2102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2102 It is hereby found and declared that there exist in cities
of all classes and villages of this state areas which have deteriorated
and become substandard and blighted because of the unsafe, insanitary,
inadequate, or overcrowded condition of the dwellings therein, or because
of inadequate planning of the area, or excessive land coverage by the
buildings thereon, or the lack of proper light and air and open space, or
because of the defective design and arrangement of the buildings thereon,
or faulty street or lot layout, or congested traffic conditions, or
economically or socially undesirable land uses, or the lack of affordable
housing in the area. Such conditions or a combination of some or all of
-3-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
them have resulted and will continue to result in making such areas
economic or social liabilities harmful to the social and economic well-
being of the entire communities in which they exist, needlessly
increasing public expenditures, imposing onerous municipal burdens,
decreasing the tax base, reducing tax revenue, substantially impairing or
arresting the sound growth of municipalities, aggravating traffic
problems, substantially impairing or arresting the elimination of traffic
hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities, and depreciating
general community-wide values. The existence of such areas contributes
substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime,
necessitating excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds
for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime
prevention, correction, prosecution, punishment and the treatment of
juvenile delinquency, and for the maintenance of adequate police, fire,
and accident protection and other public services and facilities. These
conditions are beyond remedy and control solely by regulatory process in
the exercise of the police power and cannot be dealt with effectively by
the ordinary operations of private enterprise without the aids herein
provided. The elimination of such conditions and the acquisition and
preparation of land in or necessary to the renewal of substandard and
blighted areas and its sale or lease for development or redevelopment in
accordance with general plans and redevelopment plans of communities and
any assistance which may be given by any state public body in connection
therewith are public uses and purposes for which public money may be
expended and private property acquired. The necessity in the public
interest for the provisions of the Community Development Law is hereby
declared to be a matter of legislative determination.
It is further found and declared that the prevention and elimination
of blight is a matter of state policy, public interest, and statewide
concern and within the powers and authority inhering in and reserved to
the state, in order that the state and its municipalities shall not
-4-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease,
promote juvenile delinquency, and consume an excessive proportion of
their revenue.
It is further found and declared that certain substandard and
blighted areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance,
and disposition, subject to use restrictions, as provided in the
Community Development Law, since the prevailing conditions of decay may
make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or
rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the
means provided in the Community Development Law, be susceptible of
conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and
evils, hereinbefore enumerated, may be eliminated, remedied, or
prevented; and that salvageable substandard and blighted areas can be
conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public action and the
cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of property in
such areas.
Sec. 3. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Affordable housing means (a) workforce housing, (b) housing
targeted for households earning less than sixty percent of the median
income for the county in which such housing is located, or (c) housing
under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) (1) Area of operation means and includes the area within the
corporate limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come
within the purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(3) (2) Authority means any community redevelopment authority
created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development
agency created pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a
limited community redevelopment authority;
-5-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
(4) (3) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the
presence of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating
structures, existence of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty
lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness,
insanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other
improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or special assessment
delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective or unusual
conditions of title, improper subdivision, or obsolete or no platting, or
the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and
other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs
or arrests the sound growth of the community, retards the provision of
housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability
and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in
its present condition and use and (b) in which there is at least one of
the following conditions: (i) Unemployment in the designated area is at
least one hundred twenty percent of the state or national average; (ii)
the average age of the residential or commercial units in the area is at
least forty years; (iii) more than half of the plotted and subdivided
property in an area is unimproved land that has been within the city for
forty years and has remained unimproved during that time; (iv) the per
capita income of the area is lower than the average per capita income of
the city or village in which the area is designated; or (v) the area has
had either stable or decreasing population based on the last two
decennial censuses; or (vi) less than twenty percent of the housing in
the area is affordable housing. In no event shall a city of the
metropolitan, primary, or first class designate more than thirty-five
percent of the city as blighted, a city of the second class shall not
designate an area larger than fifty percent of the city as blighted, and
a village shall not designate an area larger than one hundred percent of
the village as blighted. A redevelopment project involving a formerly
used defense site as authorized under section 18-2123.01, any area which
-6-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
is located within a good life district established under the Good Life
Transformational Projects Act, and any area declared to be an extremely
blighted area under section 18-2101.02 shall not count towards the
percentage limitations contained in this subdivision;
(5) (4) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes,
interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to
the Community Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section
18-2142.04;
(6) (5) Business means any private business located in an enhanced
employment area;
(7) (6) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
(8) (7) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(9) (8) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and
blighted area which the community redevelopment authority designates as
appropriate for a redevelopment project;
(10) (9) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result
of a redevelopment project;
(11) (10) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for
by the employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care
services, including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings
accounts, and employer reimbursement of health care costs;
(12) (11) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six
hundred acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is
designated by an authority as eligible for the imposition of an
occupation tax or (b) not within a community redevelopment area as may be
designated under section 18-2142.04;
(13) (12) Equivalent employees means the number of employees
computed by (a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the
product of forty times the number of weeks in a year;
(14) (13) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted
area in which: (a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during
-7-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
the period covered by the most recent federal decennial census or
American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least two hundred percent
of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same period;
and (b) the average poverty rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for
the total federal census tract or tracts or federal census block group or
block groups in the area;
(15) (14) Federal government means the United States of America, or
any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United
States of America;
(16) (15) Governing body or local governing body means the city
council, board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with
governing the municipality;
(17) (16) Limited community redevelopment authority means a
community redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01
having only one single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(18) (17) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the
board of trustees of the village;
(19) (18) New investment means the value of improvements to real
estate made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(20) (19) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent
employees that are employed at a business as a result of the
redevelopment project during a year that are in excess of the number of
equivalent employees during the year immediately prior to the year that a
redevelopment plan is adopted;
(21) (20) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to
section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment
project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any
part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any
contract with such authority;
(22) (21) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section
-8-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
18-2142.02;
(23) (22) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock
association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver,
assignee, or other similar representative thereof;
(24) (23) Public body means the state or any municipality, county,
township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political
subdivision or public body of the state;
(25) (24) Real property means all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used
in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or
equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of
judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such
liens;
(26) (25) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or
private corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a
redevelopment contract;
(27) (26) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into
between an authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area
in conformity with a redevelopment plan;
(28) (27) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to
time for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a
redevelopment project, which (a) conforms to the general plan for the
municipality as a whole and (b) is sufficiently complete to indicate such
land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment,
improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in
the community redevelopment area, zoning and planning changes, if any,
land uses, maximum densities, and building requirements;
(29) (28) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one
or more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and
blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or
-9-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the
proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such substandard and
blighted areas; (b) to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of
existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements
thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities,
parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks
or moving sidewalks, convention and civic centers, bus stop shelters,
lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash receptacles,
shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and
underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area
which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and
prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any
other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites
for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or
otherwise make available land in such areas for residential,
recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or
other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or for
public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with a
redevelopment plan; and may also include the preparation of the
redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a
redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements
for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all real and
personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash, or
other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other
facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any
public use specified in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such
disposition shall be at its fair value for uses in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; (e) to acquire real property in a community
redevelopment area which, under the redevelopment plan, is to be repaired
or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or
-10-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
rehabilitate the structures, and resell the property; (f) to carry out
plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or
demolition of buildings in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and
(g) in a rural community or in an extremely blighted area within a
municipality that is not a rural community, to carry out construction of
affordable workforce housing;
(30) (29) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for
assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last
certified for the year prior to the effective date of the provision
authorized in section 18-2147;
(31) (30) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census;
(32) (31) Substandard area means an area in which less than twenty
percent of the housing is affordable housing or in which there is a
predominance of buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or
residential in character, which, by reason of dilapidation,
deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation,
light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and
overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or
property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, is
conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality,
juvenile delinquency, and crime, (which cannot be remedied through
construction of prisons), and is detrimental to the public health,
safety, morals, or welfare; and
(33) (32) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering
relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that
-11-

LB626 LB626
2025 2025
cost not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct.
For purposes of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated
annually by the Department of Economic Development based upon the most
recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed
value; and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 4. Original section 18-2102, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 18-2101.02 and 18-2103, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-